DI-75
DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DIC26-02

DTC P0130 | Oxygen Sensor Circuit (Bank 1 Sensor 1)

DTC P0150 | Oxygen Sensor Circuit (Bank 2 Sensor 1)

DTC P2195 | Oxygen Sensor Signal Stack Lean (Bank 1
Sensor 1)

DTC P2196 | Oxygen Sensor Signal Stack Rich (Bank 1
Sensor 1)

DTC P2197 | Oxygen Sensor Signal Stack Lean (Bank 2
Sensor 1)

DTC P2198 | Oxygen Sensor Signal Stack Rich (Bank 2

Sensor 1)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI-35.
DTC No. Detection ltem Trouble Area
Output voltage of heated oxygen sensor remains at 0.4 V or
P0130 more, or 0.55V orless, duringidling after engine iswarmed Openershortin heated oxygen sensor circuit
P0150 up

* Heated oxygen sensor

(2 trip detection logic) * Heated oxygen sensor heater

P2195 Output voltage of heated oxygen sensor remains at0.55V *EFlorECDrelay

P2197 or less, during idling after engine is warmed up ¢ Airinduction system
(2 trip detection logic) e Fuel pressure
Outputvoltage of heated oxygen sensor remains at 0.4 V or * Injector

P2196 na il P * Engine control ECU

P2198 more, during idling after engine is warmed up
(2 trip detection logic)

HINT:
. Bank 1 refersto bankthatincludes cylinder No. 1.

. Bank 2refersto bankthatdoes notincludes cylinder No. 2.

e  Sensor 1 referstothe sensor closertothe engine assembly.

»  Theheated oxygen sensor’s outputvoltage and the short —term fueltrim value can be read usingthe
hand-heldtester.
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION
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The engine control ECU uses the HO2S information to regulate the air-fuel ratio close to the stoichiometric
ratio. This maximizes the catalytic converter’s ability to purify the exhaust gases. The HO2S detects oxygen
levels in the exhaust gas and sends a signal to the engine control ECU.

The inner surface of the sensor element is exposed to outside air. The outer surface of the sensor element
is exposed to the exhaust gases. The sensor element is made of platinum coated zirconia and includes an
integrated heating element. The HO2S’s output voltage changes suddenly in the vicinity of the stoichiometric
air—fuel ratio. The HO2S generates output voltage between 0.1 V and 0.9 V in response to the oxygen con-
centration in exhaust gas. When the front HO2S voltage is 0.45 V or more, the engine control ECU judges
that the air-fuel ratio is RICH. When it is 0.45 V or less, the engine control ECU judges that the air-fuel ratio
is LEAN.

The HO2S should indicate RICH and LEAN alternately at a regular cycle under the air-fuel ratio feedback
control. If the HO2S voltage remains at RICH or LEAN for about 20 seconds (x 3 times) on 3 different occa-
sions, the engine control ECU interprets this as malfunction of the HO2S. The engine control ECU illuminates
the MIL (2 trip detection logic) and sets a DTC.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI-35.
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

Vehicle speed 25 sec. 25 sec. 25 sec.

or more or more or more
40 kmmh | e e Oy e G

(25 mph) @ ) )
ldling (c) (e) (e) )
Ignition OFF
Engine is 30 sec. 30 sec. 30 sec.
(@) (b) Waming-up or more or more
Y A20314

(@) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(b) Switch the hand-held tester from the "normal mode” to the "check mode” (See page
DI-3).

(c) Startthe engine and letthe engineidle for untilthe Engine Coolant Temperature reaches 75 °C (167
°F).

(d) Drive the vehicle at 25 mph (40 km/h) or more for 25 seconds or more.

(e) Letthe engine idle for 30 seconds or more. Perform steps (d) and (e) at 3 times.

() Let the engine idle for 30 seconds.

HINT:

If a malfunction exists, the MIL will light up during step (f).

NOTICE:

If the conditions in this test are not strictly followed, you should perform steps (d) and (e).

Ifyoudonothaveahand -heldtester,turntheignition switch OFF after performing steps (c) to (f),

then perform steps (c) to (f) again.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Hand-heldtesteronly:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following "A/F CON-
TROL” (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(a) Perform ACTIVETESTbyhand -heldtester (A/F CONTROL).
HINT:
"A/F CONTROL”isan ACTIVE TEST which changesthe injection volumeto -12.5% or +25 %.
(1) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLC3onthevehicle.

(2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.

(4) Select the item "DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL”.

(5) Perform "A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).
RESULT:

Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25% — rich output: Morethan0.55V
-12.5% — lean output: Less than 0.4V
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NOTICE:
However,thereis afew secondsdelayinthe sensor 1 (frontsensor) output. Andthereisamaximum
20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).
Outputvoltage of heated oxygen Outputvoltage of heated oxygen Mainly suspect
sensor (sensor 1:frontsensor) Sensor (sensor 2: rear sensor) trouble area
Injection volume Injection volume
+25% +25%
-125% * -125% *
Case 1 |Outputvoltage Output voltage -
More than 0.55 V _,—\_,— More than 0.5 V _/_\_/_
Less than 0.4 V OK Lessthan0.4V OK
Injection volume Injection volume
+25 % * __________ +25 % *
_12.5% 1259 01— L 77 Sensor 1:frontsensor
Case?2 | Outputvoltage Output voltage (sensor 1, heater, sensor 1
circuit)
Almost no reaction——— — NG More than 0.5 V _/_\_/—OK
Less than 0.4 V
Injection volume Injection volume
+25 % * __________ +25 % * __________
-12.5% _125% Sensor 2: rear sensor
Case3 | Outputvoltage Output voltage (sensor 2, heater, sensor 2
More than 085V —)  — _ NG circuit)
Less than 0.4 V OK | Almostnoreaction
Injection volume Injection volume .
+95 9% * +95 % * Extremely rich or lean of the
1259 V— L7 1259 1 — L7 actual air —fuelratio
Case4 | Outputvoltage Output voltage (Injector, fuel pressure, gas
leakage in exhaust system,
Almost no reaction ——————— NG | Aimostnoreacton ————————— NG| etc.)

The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
the heated oxygensensors (sensor 1 and?2).

For displaying the graph indication, enter "ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL / USER DATA” then select "02S
B1S1 andO2SB 1S2”by pressing”YES” button and push”’ENTER” button before pressing "F4” button.
NOTICE:

Ifthe vehicleis short of fuel, the air -fuel ratiobecomes LEAN and heated oxygen sensor DTCs will
be recorded, and the MIL then comes on.

HINT:

. Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine was warmed up or not, the air —fuel ratiowasleanorrich, etc. at
the time of the malfunction.

Ahighheated oxygensensor (sensor 1) voltage (0.5V ormore) could be caused by arich air fuel mix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run rich.

+ Alowheated oxygensensor (sensor 1) voltage (0.4V orless) could be caused by alean airfuel mix-
ture. Check for conditions that would cause the engine to run lean.
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1 | Are there any other codes (besides DTC P0130, P0150, P2195, P2197, P2196 or
P2198) being output?

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand—held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /

CURRENT CODES.
CHECK:
Read the DTC using the hand—held tester.
RESULT:
Display (DTC Output) Proceed to
"P0130, P0150, P2195, P2196, P2197 and/or P2198" A

"P0130, P0150 P2195, P2196, P2197 or P2198" and other DTCs B

HINT:

If any other codes besides "P0130, P0150, P2195, P2196, P2197 and/or P2198" are output, perform the
troubleshooting for those DTCs first.

B > Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-19).
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2 | Check output voltage of heated oxygen sensor during idling.

PREPARATION:
(@) Warm up the heated oxygen sensor with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(b) Connect the hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menu: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST / ALL
/ O2S B1 S1 or B2 S1.
CHECK:
Check the output voltage of the heated oxygen sensor during idling the hand-held tester.
OK:
Heated oxygen sensor output voltage:
Alternates repeatedly between less than 0.4 V and more than 0.55 V (See the following table).

055V =---

04 V ----

A21963

OK> Go to step 9.
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3 [ Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

Components Side:
Boo|n M
\ /

@ 2]

(H13 413
El @OX

Bankl Sensorl, Bank2 Sensorl

YA
&

2

1
3

4
El/

S,

c Bank1 Sensor2, Bank2 Sensor2

A20870

OK

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor

connector.
CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen

sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection

Specified Condition

HT (H11-1) - +B (H11-2)

11.7 to 14.3 Q (20°C)

HT (H12-1) - +B (H12-2)

11.7 to 14.3 Q (20°C)

HT (H13-1) - +B (H13-2)

11 .7to 14.3 Q (20°C)

HT (H14-1) - +B (H14-2)

11 .7t0 14.3 Q (20°C)

)

Replace heated oxygen sensor.

4 | Check EFI or ECD relay.

EFIl or ECD Relay

1 3 2|4
g1
) . 1]3]

A21543
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PREPARATION:

Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.

CHECK:

Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.

OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition
Usually 10 k< or higher
1-3 Apply B+ between Below 1 9
terminals 2 and 4

)

Replace EFI or ECD relay.
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5 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and heated oxygen sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen

+B HT
/m_[:_ﬂ\ sensor connector.
/’a

(b) Disconnect the E8 engine control ECU connector.

(A1) 21 CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.

f3 4| 4|3
@ OK:
El ~— OoX
Bank1 Sensorl, Bank2 Sensorl
+B J—]_D_I—L HT HT (H11-1) - HT1A (E8-4) Below 1 Q
\//1?/ OX (H12-3) - OX1B (E8-29) Below 1 Q
HT (H12-1) - HT1B (E8-5) Below 1 Q
OX (H13-3) - OX2A (E8-22) Below 1 Q

2 |1
/ 4 3 HT (H13-1) - HT2A (E8-33) Below1 @

Components Side:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

OX (H11-3) - OX1A (E8-23) Below 1 Q

@ OX (H14-3) - OX2B (E8-21) Below 1 Q
El \L/_\_‘,_/ OX

HT (H14-1) - HT2B (E8-25) Below 1 Q
c Bank1 Sensor2, Bank2 Sen50r2A20870 OX (H11-3) or OX1A (E8-23) — )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
HT (H11-1) or HT1A (E8-4) - _
OX2B 10 k< or higher

OX1A
@ OX2A Body ground

j OX (H12-3) or OX1B (E8-29) - _
/ 10 k< or higher
raaE Body ground

HT (H12-1) or HT1B (E8-5) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

a=rY
E}%ﬁﬁ’g Engine Control
el

HT2B [ NENNERE 84 ECU Connector OoX (Hl3—3) or OX2A (E8—22) - 10 kQ or higher
Body ground
OX1B
HT (H13-1) or HT2A (E8-33) - )
c A21340 10 k< or higher

Body ground

OX (H14-3) or OX2B (E8-21) -
Body ground

HT (H14-1) or HT2B (E8-25) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

10 k< or higher
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DI-83

Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing)
Heater Oxygen

EFIl or ECD _
Relay EFl or ECD SENsor Engine Control ECU
No. 2 Fuse HT1A
From Ve N0
Battery EFl or ECD
No. 1 Fuse OXIA
[ ]
[ — ]
E2
MREL

A22009

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

6 | Check air induction system (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-1).

CHECK:
Check the air induction system for vacuum leaks.

NG> Repair or replace air induction system.

OK

7 | Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-1).

CHECK:
Check the fuel pressure (high or low pressure).

page FI-7).

NG Check and repair fuel pump, pressure regulator,
fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No. RM630E,
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8 [ Check injector injection (See Pub. No. RM630E, page Fl-24).

NG> Replace injector.

@

Replace heated oxygen sensor.

9 [ Perform confirmation driving pattern.

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern.

3

10 Is there DTC P0130, P0150, P2195, P2196, P2197 or P2198 being output again?

(See page DI-3).

NO> Check for intermittent problems

YES

Replace heated oxygen sensor.
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